Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 5. WILDLIFE AND PLANT CONSERVATION

SUBTITLE B. HUNTING AND FISHING

CHAPTER 65. ALLIGATORS

Sec. 65.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Alligator" means a living or dead American alligator (Alligator mississippiensis).

(2) "Alligator hunter" means a person who takes an alligator, an alligator egg, or any part of an alligator.

(3) "Possess" means the act of having in possession or control, keeping, detaining, restraining, or holding as owner or as agent, bailee, or custodian for another.

(4) "Take" means the act of hooking, netting, snaring, trapping, pursuing, shooting, killing, capturing, or collecting by any means or device and includes the attempt to take by the use of any method.

(5) "Resident" means an individual who has resided continuously in this state during the six months preceding the individual's application for any license or permit issued under this chapter.

(6) "Nonresident" means an individual who is not a resident.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 437, ch. 184, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 190, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 301, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 97, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 65.002. APPLICATION. Except for regulation of those populations listed on the United States List of Endangered Wildlife (50 C.F.R. Part 17), special permits issued under Chapter 43 of this code, revocation or suspension of licenses or permits under Subchapter F, Chapter 12, of this code, or contracts for the removal of reptiles entered into under Section 81.404 of this code, this chapter governs the taking, possession, and sale of alligators to the exclusion of other regulatory and licensing laws.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 437, ch. 184, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 338, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 65.003. REGULATIONS. (a) The commission may regulate by proclamation the taking, possession, propagation, transportation, exportation, importation, sale, and offering for sale of alligators, alligator eggs, or any part of an alligator that the commission considers necessary to manage this species.

(b) The regulations of the commission under this chapter may provide for:

(1) permit application forms, fees, and procedures;

(2) hearing procedures;

(3) the periods of time when it is lawful to take, possess, sell, or purchase alligators, alligator hides, alligator eggs, or any part of an alligator;

(4) limits, size, means, methods, and places in which it is lawful to take or possess alligators, alligator hides, alligator eggs, or any part of an alligator; and

(5) control of nuisance alligators.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 437, ch. 184, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 98, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 65.004. SCIENTIFIC STUDIES. The department shall conduct scientific studies and investigations of alligators as necessary to develop information on populations, distributions, habitat needs, limiting factors, and any other biological or ecological data or to determine appropriate management for public safety.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 437, ch. 184, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981.

Sec. 65.005. POSSESSION. No person may take, sell, purchase, or possess an alligator, an alligator egg, or any part of an alligator in this state except as permitted by the regulations of the commission.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 437, ch. 184, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 99, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 65.006. PERMIT REQUIRED. No person for any purpose may possess, purchase, or possess after purchase an alligator, an alligator hide, an alligator egg, or any part of an alligator taken in this state unless:

(1) the person has acquired and possesses a permit issued by the department for that purpose; or

(2) a regulation of the commission otherwise allows the possession or purchase without a permit.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 437, ch. 184, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 190, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 100, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 992 (H.B. 2026), Sec. 26, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 65.0071. EXPIRATION OF LICENSES. A license issued under this chapter is valid only during the yearly period for which the license is issued without regard to the date on which the license is acquired. Each yearly period begins on September 1 or another date set by the commission and extends through August 31 of the next year or another date set by the commission. The commission by rule may set the amount of a license fee for a license issued during a transition period at an amount lower than prescribed in this chapter and provide for a license term for a transition period that is shorter or longer than a year.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 66, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 65.008. PENALTIES. (a) A person commits an offense if the person violates this chapter or a regulation of the commission issued under this chapter.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(c) If it is shown at the trial of the defendant that he has been once before convicted of a violation of this chapter, the offense is a Class B Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(d) If it is shown at the trial of the defendant that he has been convicted of a violation of this chapter two or more previous times, the offense is a Class A Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 437, ch. 184, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 58, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 65.009. SEIZURE AND DISPOSAL OF ALLIGATORS. (a) A game warden or any other peace officer may seize an alligator, alligator hide, alligator egg, or any part of an alligator if he has probable cause to believe it was taken, possessed, sold, or purchased in violation of this chapter or of a regulation of the commission. An alligator, alligator hide, alligator egg, or alligator part seized under this section may be sold by the department to the highest of three bidders, and the proceeds of the sale shall be deposited in the appropriate department suspense fund.

(b) If a person from whom an item described by Subsection (a) was seized is found guilty, pleads guilty or nolo contendere, is placed on deferred adjudication, or fails to appear in accordance with a notice described by Section 12.106 or another law requiring that, as a condition of release, the defendant subsequently appear before a court to answer for the offense, the department shall transfer the proceeds of the sale from the suspense fund to the credit of the game, fish, and water safety account. If the person is acquitted by the trial court, the charges against the person are dismissed, or the statute of limitations period for the prosecution of the offense has expired, the department shall pay the proceeds of the sale to the person from whom the items were seized.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 325, Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

(d) A game warden or peace officer acting under the authority of this chapter or of a regulation of the commission is immune from liability and from suit for the seizure of alligators, alligator hides, alligator eggs, or any part of an alligator.

(e) To the extent practicable, Subtitle A, Title 6, Health and Safety Code, applies to an animal or animal part sold under this section that is intended for sale and use as human food.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 437, ch. 184, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1981. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 338, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 325 (H.B. 1818), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 325 (H.B. 1818), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.